Hawaii, session 2025, HB202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 383-63, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "adequate reserve fund" to read as follows: ""Adequate reserve fund" means an amount that is equal to the amount derived by multiplying the benefit cost rate that is the highest during the ten-year period ending on November 30 of each year by the total remuneration paid by all employers, with respect to all employment for which contributions are payable during the last four calendar quarters ending on June 30 of the same year, as reported on contribution reports filed on or before October 31 of the same year.  "Remuneration", as used in this definition, means wages as defined in section 383-10.  For the purpose of determining the highest benefit cost rate, the benefit cost rate for the first twelve-consecutive‑calendar-month period beginning with the first day of the first month of the ten-year period and for each succeeding twelve-consecutive-calendar-month period beginning with the first day of each subsequent month shall be computed. [Effective for the calendar years 1992 through 2007, and for calendar year 2011, "adequate reserve fund" means an amount that is equal to the amount derived by multiplying the benefit cost rate that is the highest during the ten-year period ending on November 30 of each year by the total remuneration paid by all employers, with respect to all employment for which contributions are payable during the last four calendar quarters ending on June 30 of the same year, as reported on contribution reports filed on or before October 31 of the same year. Effective for the calendar years 2023 through 2030, "adequate reserve fund"] "Adequate reserve fund" means an amount that is equal to: (1)            , for calendar year 2026; and (2)            , for calendar year 2027 and thereafter, times the amount derived by multiplying the benefit cost rate that is the highest during the ten-year period ending on November 30 of each year by the total remuneration paid by all employers, with respect to all employment for which contributions are payable during the last four calendar quarters ending on June 30 of the same year, as reported on contribution reports filed on or before October 31 of the same year, but shall not include the benefit cost rate from June 2020 through August 2021." SECTION 2.  The department of labor and industrial relations shall conduct an actuarial study to determine whether an increase in the multiplier used to calculate the adequate reserve fund, as defined in section 383-63, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is necessary to maintain sufficient reserves in the unemployment compensation trust fund to pay unemployment insurance benefits. The department of labor and industrial relations shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.